North Carolina statutes. Chapter 127A. Militia.
Article 10. Care of Military Property.

§ 127A-125.
Custody of military property.

All public military property, except when used in the performance of military duty, shall be kept in armories, or other properly designated places of deposit; and it shall be unlawful for any person charged with the care and safety of public military property to allow it out of his or her custody, except as specified in this section.

History.

1917, c. 200, s. 38; C.S., s. 6874; 1975, c. 604, s. 2; 2011-195, s. 1(a).

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2011-195, s. 1(a), effective June 23, 2011, substituted “safety of public military property to allow it out of his or her custody, except as specified in this section” for “safety of said public property to allow the same out of his custody, except as above specified.”

§ 127A-126.
Other suitable storage facilities.

All public military property of every description which may not be distributed among the units of the North Carolina National Guard or State defense militia according to law shall be stored and kept at suitable storage facilities as determined by the Adjutant General.

History.

1917, c. 200, s. 39; C.S., s. 6875; 1959, c. 218, s. 20; 1963, c. 1019, s. 3; 1975, c. 604, s. 2; 2009-281, s. 1; 2011-195, s. 1(a).

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2009-281, s. 1, effective July 10, 2009, substituted “National Guard” for “national guard” in this section.

Session Laws 2011-195, s. 1(a), effective June 23, 2011, inserted “North Carolina.”

§ 127A-127.
Property kept in good order.

Every officer and enlisted member belonging to any unit equipped with public military property shall keep and preserve the property in good order; and for neglect to do so may be punished as a court-martial may direct.

History.

1917, c. 200, s. 40; C.S., s. 6877; 1959, c. 218, s. 22; 1975, c. 604, s. 2; 2011-195, s. 1(a).

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2011-195, s. 1(a), effective June 23, 2011, substituted “preserve the property” for “preserve such property.”

§ 127A-128.
Equipment and vehicles.

Equipment and vehicles issued by the Department of Defense to the North Carolina National Guard or State defense militia shall be used solely for military purposes, except in those specific cases where nonmilitary use is authorized by the Department of Defense or the Governor. Necessary expense in maintaining equipment and vehicles, not provided for by the federal government, shall be a proper charge against State funds appropriated for the North Carolina National Guard: Provided, the expense shall be specifically authorized by the Governor and certified by the Adjutant General.

History.

1917, c. 200, s. 41; C.S., s. 6878; 1921, c. 120, s. 9; 1959, c. 218, s. 23; 1963, c. 1019, s. 4; 1967, c. 563, s. 5; 1975, c. 604, s. 2; 2009-281, s. 1; 2011-195, s. 1(a).

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2009-281, s. 1, effective July 10, 2009, substituted “National Guard” for “national guard” twice in this section.

Session Laws 2011-195, s. 1(a), effective June 23, 2011, twice inserted “North Carolina,” substituted “Department of Defense or the Governor” for “Department of Defense and/or the Governor,” and made minor stylistic changes.

§ 127A-129.
Transfer of property.

All officers accountable or responsible for public funds, property, or books, before being relieved from the duty, shall turn them over according to the regulations prescribed by the Governor.

History.

1917, c. 200, s. 42; C.S., s. 6879; 1975, c. 604, s. 2; 2011-195, s. 1(a).

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2011-195, s. 1(a), effective June 23, 2011, substituted “shall turn them over” for “shall turn over the same.”

§ 127A-130.
Replacement of lost or damaged property.

Whenever any military property issued to the North Carolina National Guard or State defense militia shall have been lost, damaged, or destroyed, and upon report of a disinterested surveying officer it shall appear that the loss, damage, or destruction of property was due to carelessness or neglect, or that its loss, damage or destruction could have been avoided by exercise of able care, the money value of the property shall be charged to the responsible officer or enlisted member, and the pay of the officers and enlisted members from both federal and State funds at any time accruing may be stopped and applied to the payment of any such indebtedness until it is discharged.

History.

1917, c. 200, s. 43; C.S., s. 6880; 1959, c. 218, s. 24; 1963, c. 1019, s. 5; 1975, c. 604, s. 2; 2009-281, s. 1; 2011-195, s. 1(a).

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2009-281, s. 1, effective July 10, 2009, substituted “National Guard” for “national guard” in this section.

Session Laws 2011-195, s. 1(a), effective June 23, 2011, inserted “North Carolina,” deleted “of the State” following “State defense militia,” and made minor stylistic changes.

§ 127A-131.
Unlawful conversion or willful destruction of military property.

If any person shall willfully or wantonly destroy or injure, willfully retain after demand made or otherwise convert to the person’s own use any property of the State or of the United States issued for the purpose of arming or equipping the militia of the State or if any person shall purchase any property of the State or of the United States knowing it to be unlawfully obtained, the person shall be guilty of a Class 1 misdemeanor.

Any person, firm or corporation receiving in pledge or buying from any other person, firm or corporation for the purpose of resale any goods, to include arms, ammunition, explosives, equipment, clothing, supplies and materials, which may reasonably be thought to be the property of the Armed Forces of the United States and their reserve components or of the militia of the State of North Carolina, shall keep a register and shall enter therein a true and accurate record of each purchase, showing the name, social security number and address of the person from whom purchased, the name and address of the firm or corporation from whom purchased, together with the amount paid for each item or lot of small items, the date of purchase, the serial numbers of all items bearing serial numbers, and any other marks, brands or descriptions which will serve to identify the items purchased. The register shall be at all times open to the inspection of the public. Any person, firm or corporation failing to comply with this provision shall be guilty of a Class 1 misdemeanor; and any person, firm or corporation making a false entry in such register shall be guilty of a Class 1 misdemeanor.

History.

1876-7, c. 272, s. 19; Code, s. 3274; Rev., ss. 3536, 3537; C.S., ss. 6881, 6882; 1959, c. 218, s. 25; 1963, c. 1019, s. 6; 1975, c. 604, s. 2; 1993, c. 539, s. 936; 1994, Ex. Sess., c. 24, s. 14(c); 2011-195, s. 1(a).

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2011-195, s. 1(a), effective June 23, 2011, in subsection (a), substituted “the person’s own use” for “his own use” and “the person shall be guilty” for “he shall be guilty”; and in the first sentence of subsection (b), substituted “Armed Forces” for “armed forces.”

§§ 127A-132 through 127A-136.

Reserved for future codification purposes.